Texas statutes.
BUSINESS ORGANIZATIONS CODE

TITLE 8. MISCELLANEOUS AND TRANSITION PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 401. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 401.001. DEFINITIONS. In this title:

(1) "Mandatory application date" means:

(A) for an entity subject to this code under Section 402.001, January 1, 2006;

(B) for an entity subject to this code under Section 402.003 or 402.004, the date of completion of the action required by that section but no earlier than January 1, 2006; and

(C) for any other entity, January 1, 2010.

(2) "Prior law" means the applicable law in effect before January 1, 2006.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 182, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2006.